Utah statutes.
41-12a-303.3.   Providing false evidence of owner's or operator's security -- Penalty.

A person who provides evidence of owner's or operator's security to a peace officer under Section 41-12a-303.2 knowing or having reason to believe that the evidence of owner's or operator's security is false or that it is evidence of owner's or operator's security that is not in effect is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 1994 General Session

